firefox-addon/dictionaries/tr.dic
acımak/≑
adamak/≑
afallamak/≑
ahlamak/≑
akaçlamak/≑
aksamak/≑
akşamlamak/≑
alalamak/≑
alaşımlamak/≑
alkışlamak/≑
altlamak/≑
alımlamak/≑
amaçlamak/≑
ambarlamak/≑
anahtarlamak/≑
ansımak/≑
anımsamak/≑
araklamak/≑
aramak/≑
arkalamak/≑
artıklamak/≑
arılamak/≑
asfaltlamak/≑
atamak/≑
atlamak/≑
ayaklamak/≑
ayarlamak/≑
aykırılamak/≑
ayrımlamak/≑
ayrıntılamak/≑
ayıplamak/≑
azımsamak/≑
açıklamak/≑
açınsamak/≑
ağlamak/≑
ağrımak/≑
ağırlamak/≑
ağızlamak/≑
aşağısamak/≑
aşılamak/≑
baharatlamak/≑
baltalamak/≑
bandajlamak/≑
banlamak/≑
barikatlamak/≑
baskılamak/≑
bavlımak/≑
bayatsımak/≑
bağdamak/≑
bağımlamak/≑
bağışlamak/≑
başaklamak/≑
beyazlamak/≑
bohçalamak/≑
bordalamak/≑
boğasamak/≑
bukağılamak/≑
bılkımak/≑
bıçaklamak/≑
carlamak/≑
cayırdamak/≑
cevaplamak/≑
ciyaklamak/≑
cukkalamak/≑
cımbarlamak/≑
cırlamak/≑
cırnaklamak/≑
cırıldamak/≑
cıvıldamak/≑
cıyaklamak/≑
cızlamak/≑
cızırdamak/≑
dallamak/≑
damlamak/≑
dangırdamak/≑
dayamak/≑
dağlamak/≑
doğaçlamak/≑
dumanlamak/≑
duraksamak/≑
duvaklamak/≑
dızlamak/≑
dışkılamak/≑
dışsatımlamak/≑
fakslamak/≑
faturalamak/≑
fiyatlamak/≑
fosfatlamak/≑
fıkramak/≑
fırlamak/≑
fırçalamak/≑
fısfıslamak/≑
fıstıklamak/≑
fıçılamak/≑
fışlamak/≑
fışırdamak/≑
gagalamak/≑
gammazlamak/≑
gıcıklamak/≑
gıdaklamak/≑
gırgırlamak/≑
gırtlamak/≑
hafızlamak/≑
halkalamak/≑
hapazlamak/≑
haritalamak/≑
harmanlamak/≑
hasırlamak/≑
hatırlamak/≑
haydalamak/≑
haylamak/≑
haçlamak/≑
haşıllamak/≑
hesaplamak/≑
hırlamak/≑
hırıldamak/≑
hışıldamak/≑
ihbarlamak/≑
ilaçlamak/≑
inhimak/≑≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
kabaklamak/≑
kadrajlamak/≑
kakımak/≑
kalafatlamak/≑
kalgımak/≑
kamalamak/≑
kanamak/≑
kangallamak/≑
kantarlamak/≑
kanıtlamak/≑
kapamak/≑
kapsamak/≑
karamak/≑
karbonatlamak/≑
kargımak/≑
karlamak/≑
karımak/≑
karışlamak/≑
karşıtlamak/≑
kasnaklamak/≑
katarlamak/≑
katranlamak/≑
kavgımak/≑
kavramak/≑
kayarlamak/≑
kaypamak/≑
kayşamak/≑
kazımak/≑
kaçımsamak/≑
kaşağılamak/≑
kaşıklamak/≑
kiralamak/≑
kolajlamak/≑
kolaylamak/≑
konaklamak/≑
kopçalamak/≑
kovalamak/≑
kucaklamak/≑
kundaklamak/≑
kuşaklamak/≑
kıkırdamak/≑
kılıflamak/≑
kımıldamak/≑
kınamak/≑
kıpramak/≑
kırbaçlamak/≑
kırıklamak/≑
kısımlamak/≑
kıtıklamak/≑
kıvramak/≑
kıyılamak/≑
kığılamak/≑
kışlamak/≑
lambalamak/≑
lıkırdamak/≑
madımak/≑≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
makadamlamak/≑
makyajlamak/≑
malalamak/≑
mandallamak/≑
markalamak/≑
masajlamak/≑
mayınlamak/≑
miyavlamak/≑
mumyalamak/≑
mıhlamak/≑
mıncıklamak/≑
mırıldamak/≑
mışıldamak/≑
nallamak/≑
nişanlamak/≑
notalamak/≑
odaklamak/≑
onaylamak/≑
orantılamak/≑
orsalamak/≑
otalamak/≑
oyalamak/≑
oğlaklamak/≑
paklamak/≑
paraflamak/≑
parlamak/≑
parçalamak/≑
paspaslamak/≑
patlamak/≑
payandalamak/≑
pazarlamak/≑
peydahlamak/≑
planlamak/≑
pompalamak/≑
postalamak/≑
programlamak/≑
pudralamak/≑
pırpırlamak/≑
pırıldamak/≑
pışpışlamak/≑
rakamlamak/≑
raspalamak/≑
rüzgârlamak/≑
sakatlamak/≑
sakırdamak/≑
salkımak/≑
sallamamak/≑
sancımak/≑
saplamak/≑
sarmalamak/≑
savaklamak/≑
savsamak/≑
sayrımsamak/≑
saçalamak/≑
selamlamak/≑
silahlamak/≑
soğanlamak/≑
sınamak/≑
sırlamak/≑
sıvalamak/≑
sıçramak/≑
takırdamak/≑
tamlamak/≑
tanılamak/≑
tapalamak/≑
tapışlamak/≑
taraşlamak/≑
taslamak/≑
taylamak/≑
telalamak/≑
tokatlamak/≑
topaklamak/≑
toparlamak/≑
tornalamak/≑
tutamlamak/≑
tuzaklamak/≑
tıklamak/≑
tıngıldamak/≑
tınlamak/≑
tıpışlamak/≑
tırmalamak/≑
tırnaklamak/≑
tırıllamak/≑
uslamlamak/≑
uzaksamak/≑
vakvaklamak/≑
viyaklamak/≑
vıcırdamak/≑
vırıldamak/≑
yabalamak/≑
yabansımak/≑
yadırgamak/≑
yakınsamak/≑
yalamak/≑
yaldızlamak/≑
yamamak/≑
yanlamak/≑
yansılamak/≑
yanşamak/≑
yaramak/≑
yarmalamak/≑
yasaklamak/≑
yaslamak/≑
yastıklamak/≑
yayıklamak/≑
yayınlamak/≑
yağlamak/≑
yaşmaklamak/≑
yorgalamak/≑
yuvalamak/≑
yıldıramak/≑
yıllamak/≑
zamanlamak/≑
zarflamak/≑
zağlamak/≑
zımparalamak/≑
zıpkınlamak/≑
zırlamak/≑
çabalamak/≑
çalkamak/≑
çangırdamak/≑
çaplamak/≑
çatlamak/≑
çatırdamak/≑
çağıldamak/≑
çobanlamak/≑
çuvallamak/≑
çıkılamak/≑
çınlamak/≑
çırçırlamak/≑
çıtırdamak/≑
ıklamak/≑
ılgarlamak/≑
ıralamak/≑
ırgamak/≑
ıskalamak/≑
ısmarlamak/≑
ışılamak/≑
ışımak/≑
şakramak/≑
şamandıralamak/≑
şampuanlamak/≑
şapırdamak/≑
şarıldamak/≑
şaşalamak/≑
şıngırdamak/≑
şırıldamak/≑
